Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1501
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 8-1501 to 8-1505, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Person means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, association, joint venture, pool, syndicate, sole proprietorship, unincorporated organization, or other form of entity not specifically listed in this subdivision; and

(2) Control means to own directly or indirectly or to control in any manner twenty-five percent or more of the voting shares of any bank, trust company, or holding company or to control in any manner the election of the majority of directors of any bank, trust company, or holding company.

Laws 1983, LB 240, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 102;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 11.